Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-105
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission; creation; members; appointment; qualifications.

There is hereby created the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, consisting of three members to be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members elected to the Legislature, no more than two of whom shall be members of the same political party, and no two shall be citizens of the same congressional district.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 6, p. 379;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-306;

R.S.1943, § 53-105;

Laws 1965, c. 318, § 3, p. 890.

Under former act, it did not provide for, or require, confirmation of appointment of members of the Liquor Control Commission by the Legislature. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).